Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.130

Waivers, limitations, disclaimers—Void.

Any agreement entered into by a consumer for the purchase of a new motor vehicle that waives, limits, or disclaims the rights set forth in RCW 19.118.021 through 19.118.140 shall be void as contrary to public policy. Said rights shall extend to a subsequent transferee of such new motor vehicle.

[ 1987 c 344 s 11.]